Georgia, session 2025_26, SB147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 42 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
conditions of detention generally relative to correctional institutions of state and counties,
is amended in Code Section 42-5-64, relating to educational programming and information
provided to released prisoners, by revising subsections (e) through (g) and adding a new
subsection to read as follows:
"(e) When a person is released from confinement from the department, the department
shall issue to such releasee, with his or her consent, documents pertaining to: shall, upon
request from an eligible person, provide such person with the relevant documentation to assist
S. B. 147
- 1 -

SB 147/FA
him or her in obtaining post-release employment and shall coordinate with the Department
of Driver Services to provide a state issued identification card pursuant to Code Section
40-5-107 if such person does not have a current state issued identification card or driver's
license. The department may also include a Program and Treatment Completion
Certificate, if such person is eligible.
(1) The releasee's program history, including:
(A) Whether the releasee completed training requested by the State Board of Pardons
and Paroles;
(B) Whether the releasee completed programs recommended by the department;
(C) Whether the releasee obtained a state approved high school equivalency (HSE)
diploma or other educational degree while incarcerated; and
(D) The releasee's institutional work record, including skills obtained through any job
training; and
(2) Other information considered relevant by the department.
(f) When a person is released from confinement from the department, the department may,
in conjunction with the Department of Driver Services, issue such releasee a personal
identification card pursuant to Code Section 40-5-107. The department may also issue a
Program and Treatment Completion Certificate, if such releasee is eligible. For purposes
of assisting an inmate in obtaining post-release employment, the department shall, upon
request from an eligible person, provide the inmate with the following documentation upon
such person's release:
(1) A copy of the vocational training record of the inmate, if applicable;
(2) A copy of the work record of the inmate, if applicable;
(3) A certified copy of the birth certificate of the inmate, if obtainable;
(4) A social security card or a replacement social security card for the inmate, if
obtainable;
S. B. 147
- 2 -

SB 147/FA
(5) A resume that includes any trade learned by the inmate and such inmate's proficiency
at such trade;
(6) Documentation that the inmate has completed a practice job interview; and
(7) A notification to the inmate if he or she is eligible to apply for a license from a state
entity charged with oversight of an occupational license or certification.
(g) The following categories of inmates are not required to complete resumes or practice
job interviews prior to their release from incarceration:
(1) Inmates 65 years of age or older;
(2) Inmates releasing to medical reprieve or discharging from a prison infirmary setting;
(3) Inmates releasing to the custody of another jurisdiction on a warrant or detainer; and
(4) Inmates that the department determines would be physically or mentally unable to
return to the workforce upon release from incarceration.
(g)(h) The commissioner and other relevant state agencies shall be authorized to
promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this Code
section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 147
- 3 -